Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-874
County; powers; vote of electors not required.

In exercising any or all of the powers granted to the county in sections 39-855 to 39-876, the governing body of the county may act, and no vote of the electors of the county shall be required.

Laws 1935, c. 87, § 9, p. 283;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-2109;

R.S.1943, § 39-874.